Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 3. Operation and Management of Association.

§ 55.1-1815.
Access to association records; association meetings; notice.

The association shall keep detailed records of receipts and expenditures affecting the operation and administration of the association. All financial books and records shall be kept in accordance with generally accepted accounting practices.

Subject to the provisions of subsection C and so long as the request is for a proper purpose related to his membership in the association, all books and records kept by or on behalf of the association shall be available for examination and copying by a member in good standing or his authorized agent, including:

The association’s membership list and addresses, which shall not be used for purposes of pecuniary gain or commercial solicitation; and

The actual salary of the six highest compensated employees of the association earning over $75,000 and aggregate salary information of all other employees of the association; however, individual salary information shall not be available for examination and copying during the declarant control period.Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, this right of examination shall exist without reference to the duration of membership and may be exercised (i) only during reasonable business hours or at a mutually convenient time and location and (ii) upon five business days’ written notice for an association managed by a common interest community manager and 10 business days’ written notice for a self-managed association, which notice reasonably identifies the purpose for the request and the specific books and records of the association requested.

Books and records kept by or on behalf of an association may be withheld from inspection and copying to the extent that they concern:

Personnel matters relating to specific, identified persons or a person’s medical records;

Contracts, leases, and other commercial transactions to purchase or provide goods or services, currently in or under negotiation;

Pending or probable litigation. For purposes of this subdivision, “probable litigation” means those instances where there has been a specific threat of litigation from a person or the legal counsel of such person;

Matters involving state or local administrative or other formal proceedings before a government tribunal for enforcement of the association documents or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to §

55.1-1819

;

Communications with legal counsel that relate to subdivisions 1 through 4 or that are protected by the attorney-client privilege or the attorney work product doctrine;

Disclosure of information in violation of law;

Meeting minutes or other confidential records of an executive session of the board of directors held in accordance with subsection C of §

55.1-1816

;

Documentation, correspondence, or management or board reports compiled for or on behalf of the association or the board by its agents or committees for consideration by the board in executive session; or

Individual lot owner or member files, other than those of the requesting lot owner, including any individual lot owner’s or member’s files kept by or on behalf of the association.

Books and records kept by or on behalf of an association shall be withheld from inspection and copying in their entirety only to the extent that an exclusion from disclosure under subsection C applies to the entire content of such books and records. Otherwise, only those portions of the books and records containing information subject to an exclusion under subsection C may be withheld or redacted, and all portions of the books and records that are not so excluded shall be available for examination and copying, provided that the requesting member shall be responsible to the association for paying or reimbursing the association for any reasonable costs incurred by the association in responding to the request for the books and records and review for redaction of the same.

Prior to providing copies of any books and records to a member in good standing under this section, the association may impose and collect a charge, reflecting the reasonable costs of materials and labor, not to exceed the actual costs of such materials and labor. Charges may be imposed only in accordance with a cost schedule adopted by the board of directors in accordance with this subsection. The cost schedule shall (i) specify the charges for materials and labor, (ii) apply equally to all members in good standing, and (iii) be provided to such requesting member at the time the request is made.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections B and C, all books and records of the association, including individual salary information for all employees and payments to independent contractors, shall be available for examination and copying upon request by a member of the board of directors in the discharge of his duties as a director.

Meetings of the association shall be held in accordance with the provisions of the bylaws at least once each year after the formation of the association. The bylaws shall specify an officer or his agent who shall, at least 14 days in advance of any annual or regularly scheduled meeting and at least seven days in advance of any other meeting, send to each member notice of the time, place, and purposes of such meeting. In the event of cancellation of any annual meeting of the association at which directors are elected, the seven-day notice of any subsequent meeting scheduled to elect such directors shall include a statement that the meeting is scheduled for the purpose of the election of directors.Notice shall be sent by United States mail to all members at the address of their respective lots unless the member has provided to such officer or his agent an address other than the address of the member’s lot. In lieu of sending such notice by United States mail, notice may instead be (i) hand delivered by the officer or his agent, provided that the officer or his agent certifies in writing that notice was delivered to the member, or (ii) sent to the member by electronic mail, provided that the member has elected to receive such notice by electronic mail and, in the event that such electronic mail is returned as undeliverable, notice is subsequently sent by United States mail. Except as provided in subdivision C 7, draft minutes of the board of directors shall be open for inspection and copying (a) within 60 days from the conclusion of the meeting to which such minutes appertain or (b) when such minutes are distributed to board members as part of an agenda package for the next meeting of the board of directors, whichever occurs first.

Unless expressly prohibited by the governing documents, a member may vote at a meeting of the association in person, by proxy, or by absentee ballot. Such voting may take place by electronic means, provided that the board of directors has adopted guidelines for such voting by electronic means. Members voting by absentee ballot or proxy shall be deemed to be present at the meeting for all purposes.

History.

1989, c. 679, § 55-510; 1991, c. 667; 1992, cc. 69, 71; 1993, cc. 365, 827; 1999, cc. 594, 654, 1029; 2000, cc. 905, 1008; 2001, c. 419; 2003, c. 442; 2004, c. 193; 2007, c. 675; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2009, c. 665; 2011, c. 361; 2013, c. 275; 2014, c. 207; 2018, c. 663; 2019, cc. 368, 712; 2020, c. 592; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9, 494.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 368 amended § 55-510 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in the second paragraph of subsection G, by substituting “In lieu of sending such notice by United States mail, notice may be (i) hand delivered by the officer or his agent, provided that the officer or his agent certifies in writing that notice was delivered to the member, or (ii) sent to the member by electronic mail, provided that the member has elected to receive such notice by electronic mail and, in the event that such electronic mail is returned as undeliverable, notice is subsequently sent by United States mail” for “Notice may instead be hand delivered by the officer or his agent, provided that the officer or his agent certifies in writing that notice was delivered to the member” and redesignating clauses (i) and (ii) in the last sentence as clauses (a) and (b).

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 592 deleted “having standing to bring legal action” following “from a person” in subdivision C 3.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9 and 494, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added subsection H.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinions cited below refer to prior law.

Homeowners association may limit units offered for rent by single owner. —

If properly written, adopted and enforced, authorized as to purpose and not in conflict with an association’s declarations, bylaws or rules and regulations, a homeowners’ association may covenant to limit the number of housing units within the association that may be offered for rent by the owner to tenants. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kathy J. Byron, Member, House of Delegates, 10-078,
(01/24/11).

Developer’s control of homeowners’ association. —

Since the Virginia Property Owners Act does not expressly provide or otherwise allow for a developer to maintain control of a homeowners’ association for a specific period of time or until a specific number of lots or units are sold, there is no Virginia Code provision to evaluate for constitutionality. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Bryce E. Reeves, Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-104,
(1/11/13).

§ 55.1-1816.
Meetings of the board of directors.

All meetings of the board of directors, including any subcommittee or other committee of the board of directors, where the business of the association is discussed or transacted shall be open to all members of record. The board of directors shall not use work sessions or other informal gatherings of the board of directors to circumvent the open meeting requirements of this section. Minutes of the meetings of the board of directors shall be recorded and shall be available as provided in subsection B of §

55.1-1815

.

Notice of the time, date, and place of each meeting of the board of directors or of any subcommittee or other committee of the board of directors shall be published where it is reasonably calculated to be available to a majority of the lot owners.A lot owner may make a request to be notified on a continual basis of any such meetings. Such request shall be made at least once a year in writing and include the lot owner’s name, address, zip code, and any email address as appropriate. Notice of the time, date, and place shall be sent to any lot owner requesting notice (i) by first-class mail or email in the case of meetings of the board of directors or (ii) by email in the case of meetings of any subcommittee or other committee of the board of directors.Notice, reasonable under the circumstances, of special or emergency meetings shall be given contemporaneously with the notice provided to members of the association’s board of directors or any subcommittee or other committee of the board of directors conducting the meeting.Unless otherwise exempt as relating to an executive session pursuant to subsection C, at least one copy of all agenda packets and materials furnished to members of an association’s board of directors or subcommittee or other committee of the board of directors for a meeting shall be made available for inspection by the membership of the association at the same time such documents are furnished to the members of the board of directors or any subcommittee or committee of the board of directors.Any member may record any portion of a meeting that is required to be open. The board of directors or subcommittee or other committee of the board of directors conducting the meeting may adopt rules (a) governing the placement and use of equipment necessary for recording a meeting to prevent interference with the proceedings and (b) requiring the member recording the meeting to provide notice that the meeting is being recorded.Except for the election of officers, voting by secret or written ballot in an open meeting shall be a violation of this chapter.

The board of directors or any subcommittee or other committee of the board of directors may (i) convene in executive session to consider personnel matters; (ii) consult with legal counsel; (iii) discuss and consider contracts, pending or probable litigation, and matters involving violations of the declaration or rules and regulations adopted pursuant to such declaration for which a member or his family members, tenants, guests, or other invitees are responsible; or (iv) discuss and consider the personal liability of members to the association, upon the affirmative vote in an open meeting to assemble in executive session. The motion shall state specifically the purpose for the executive session. Reference to the motion and the stated purpose for the executive session shall be included in the minutes. The board of directors shall restrict the consideration of matters during such portions of meetings to only those purposes specifically exempted and stated in the motion. No contract, motion, or other action adopted, passed, or agreed to in executive session shall become effective unless the board of directors or subcommittee or other committee of the board of directors, following the executive session, reconvenes in open meeting and takes a vote on such contract, motion, or other action, which shall have its substance reasonably identified in the open meeting. The requirements of this section shall not require the disclosure of information in violation of law.

Subject to reasonable rules adopted by the board of directors, the board of directors shall provide a designated period during each meeting to allow members an opportunity to comment on any matter relating to the association. During a meeting at which the agenda is limited to specific topics or at a special meeting, the board of directors may limit the comments of members to the topics listed on the meeting agenda.

History.

1999, c. 1029, § 55-510.1; 2000, c. 905; 2001, c. 715; 2003, c. 404; 2004, c. 333; 2005, c. 353; 2019, c. 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9, 494.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 9 and 494, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted the former sixth paragraph in subsection B, which read, “If a meeting is conducted by telephone conference or video conference or similar electronic means, at least two members of the board of directors shall be physically present at the meeting place included in the notice. The audio equipment shall be sufficient for any member in attendance to hear what is said by any member of the board of directors participating in the meeting who is not physically present”; and substituted “period during each meeting” for “period of time during a meeting” in the first sentence of subsection D.

§ 55.1-1817.
Distribution of information by members.

The board of directors shall establish a reasonable, effective, and free method, appropriate to the size and nature of the association, for lot owners to communicate among themselves and with the board of directors regarding any matter concerning the association.

History.

2001, c. 715, § 55-510.2; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1818.
Common areas; notice of pesticide application.

The association shall post notice of all pesticide applications in or upon the common areas. Such notice shall consist of conspicuous signs placed in or upon the common areas where the pesticide will be applied at least 48 hours prior to the application.

History.

2011, c. 264, § 55-510.3; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1819.
Adoption and enforcement of rules.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the board of directors shall have the power to establish, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations with respect to use of the common areas and with respect to such other areas of responsibility assigned to the association by the declaration, except where expressly reserved by the declaration to the members. Rules and regulations may be adopted by resolution and shall be reasonably published or distributed throughout the development. At a special meeting of the association convened in accordance with the provisions of the association’s bylaws, a majority of votes cast at such meeting may repeal or amend any rule or regulation adopted by the board of directors. Rules and regulations may be enforced by any method normally available to the owner of private property in Virginia, including application for injunctive relief or actual damages, during which the court shall award to the prevailing party court costs and reasonable attorney fees.

The board of directors shall also have the power, to the extent the declaration or rules and regulations duly adopted pursuant to such declaration expressly so provide, to (i) suspend a member’s right to use facilities or services, including utility services, provided directly through the association for nonpayment of assessments that are more than 60 days past due, to the extent that access to the lot through the common areas is not precluded and provided that such suspension shall not endanger the health, safety, or property of any owner, tenant, or occupant, and (ii) assess charges against any member for any violation of the declaration or rules and regulations for which the member or his family members, tenants, guests, or other invitees are responsible.

Before any action authorized in this section is taken, the member shall be given a reasonable opportunity to correct the alleged violation after written notice of the alleged violation to the member at the address required for notices of meetings pursuant to §

55.1-1815

. If the violation remains uncorrected, the member shall be given an opportunity to be heard and to be represented by counsel before the board of directors or other tribunal specified in the documents.Notice of a hearing, including the actions that may be taken by the association in accordance with this section, shall be hand delivered or mailed by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the member at the address of record with the association at least 14 days prior to the hearing. Within seven days of the hearing, the hearing result shall be hand delivered or mailed by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the member at the address of record with the association.

The amount of any charges so assessed shall not be limited to the expense or damage to the association caused by the violation, but shall not exceed $50 for a single offense or $10 per day for any offense of a continuing nature, and shall be treated as an assessment against the member’s lot for the purposes of §

55.1-1833

. However, the total charges for any offense of a continuing nature shall not be assessed for a period exceeding 90 days.

The board of directors may file or defend legal action in general district or circuit court that seeks relief, including injunctive relief arising from any violation of the declaration or duly adopted rules and regulations.

After the date an action is filed in the general district or circuit court by (i) the association, by and through its counsel, to collect the charges or obtain injunctive relief and correct the violation or (ii) the lot owner challenging any such charges, no additional charges shall accrue. If the court rules in favor of the association, the association shall be entitled to collect such charges from the date the action was filed as well as all other charges assessed pursuant to this section against the lot owner prior to the action. In addition, if the court finds that the violation remains uncorrected, the court may order the lot owner to abate or remedy the violation.

In any action filed in general district court pursuant to this section, the court may enter default judgment against the lot owner on the association’s sworn affidavit.

History.

1989, c. 679, § 55-513; 1991, c. 667; 1993, c. 956; 1994, c. 368; 1997, cc. 173, 417; 2000, cc. 846, 905; 2002, c. 509; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2011, cc. 372, 378; 2014, c. 784; 2019, c. 712; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 131.

Cross references.

As to civil jurisdiction of general district courts, see § 16.1-77.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 131, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, rewrote the third sentence, which formerly read: “A majority of votes cast, in person or by proxy, at a meeting convened in accordance with the provisions of the association’s bylaws and called for that purpose shall repeal or amend any rule or regulation adopted by the board of directors” and substituted “the court shall award” for “the court may award” in the last sentence.

§ 55.1-1819.1.
Limitation of smoking in development.

Except to the extent that the declaration provides otherwise, the board of directors may establish reasonable rules that restrict smoking in the development, including rules that prohibit smoking in the common areas. For developments that include attached private dwelling units, such rules may prohibit smoking within such dwelling units. Rules adopted pursuant to this section may be enforced in accordance with §

55.1-1819

.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 131.

Editor’s note.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 55.1-1820.
Display of the flag of the United States; necessary supporting structures; affirmative defense.

In accordance with the federal Freedom to Display the American Flag Act of 2005 (P.L. 109-243), no association shall prohibit any lot owner from displaying upon property to which the lot owner has a separate ownership interest or a right to exclusive possession or use the flag of the United States whenever such display is in compliance with Chapter 1 of Title 4 of the United States Code (4 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.), or any rule or custom pertaining to the proper display of the flag. The association may, however, establish reasonable restrictions as to the size, place, duration, and manner of placement or display of the flag on such property, provided that such restrictions are necessary to protect a substantial interest of the association.

The association may restrict the display of such flag in the common areas.

In any action brought by the association under §

55.1-1819

for violation of a flag restriction, the association shall bear the burden of proof that the restrictions as to the size, place, duration, and manner of placement or display of such flag are necessary to protect a substantial interest of the association.

In any action brought by the association under §

55.1-1819

, the lot owner shall be entitled to assert as an affirmative defense that the required disclosure of any limitations pertaining to the display of flags or any flagpole or similar structure necessary to display such flags was not contained in the disclosure packet required pursuant to §

55.1-1809

.

History.

2000, c. 891, § 55-513.1; 2007, cc. 854, 910; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2010, cc. 166, 453; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1820.1.
Installation of solar energy collection devices.

As used in this section, “solar energy collection device” means any device manufactured and sold for the sole purpose of facilitating the collection and beneficial use of solar energy, including passive heating panels or building components and solar photovoltaic apparatus.

No association shall prohibit an owner from installing a solar energy collection device on that owner’s property unless the recorded declaration for the association establishes such a prohibition. However, an association may establish reasonable restrictions concerning the size, place, and manner of placement of such solar energy collection devices on property designated and intended for individual ownership and use. Any disclosure packet pursuant to §

55.1-1809

given to a purchaser shall contain a statement setting forth any restriction, limitation, or prohibition on the right of an owner to install or use solar energy collection devices on his property.

A restriction shall be deemed not to be reasonable if application of the restriction to a particular proposal (i) increases the cost of installation of the solar energy collection device by five percent over the projected cost of the initially proposed installation or (ii) reduces the energy production by the solar energy collection device by 10 percent below the projected energy production of the initially proposed installation. The owner shall provide documentation prepared by an independent solar panel design specialist, who is certified by the North American Board of Certified Energy Practitioners and is licensed in Virginia, that is satisfactory to the association to show that the restriction is not reasonable according to the criteria established in this subsection.

The association may prohibit or restrict the installation of solar energy collection devices on the common elements or common area within the real estate development served by the association. An association may establish reasonable restrictions as to the number, size, place, and manner of placement or installation of any solar energy collection device installed on the common elements or common area.

History.

2006, c. 939, §§ 67-700, 67-701; 2008, c. 881; 2009, c. 866; 2013, c. 357; 2014, c. 525; 2020, cc. 272, 795; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Former §§ 67-700 and 67-701 were rewritten as one section and recodified by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, effective October 1, 2021. The section was placed in the Property Owners’ Association Act
(as this section), the Virginia Condominium Act (§

55.1-1951.1

), and the Virginia Real Estate Cooperative Act (§

55.1-2133.1

).

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Solar panels. —

Under § 67-701 as amended, effective July 1, 2014, a property owners’ association may prohibit solar panels on private property only through a recorded declaration but not through any other means. Other than as may be contained in recorded declarations, such prohibitions are unenforceable, regardless of when or how they were imposed.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Joseph R. Yost, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, No. 14-057,
(4/14/15).

A property owners’ association retains the authority under § 67-701 to establish reasonable restrictions concerning the size, location, and manner of placement of solar panels on private property, either through a recorded declaration or by any other legal means.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Joseph R. Yost, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, No. 14-057,
(4/14/15).

§ 55.1-1821.
Home-based businesses permitted; compliance with local ordinances.

Except to the extent that the declaration provides otherwise, no association shall prohibit any lot owner from operating a home-based business within his personal residence. The association may, however, establish (i) reasonable restrictions as to the time, place, and manner of the operation of a home-based business and (ii) reasonable restrictions as to the size, place, duration, and manner of the placement or display of any signs on the owner’s lot related to such home-based business. Any home-based business shall comply with all applicable local ordinances.

If a development is located in a locality that classifies home-based child care services as an accessory or ancillary residential use under the locality’s zoning ordinance, the provision of home-based child care services in a personal residence shall be deemed a residential use unless expressly (i) prohibited or restricted by the declaration or (ii) restricted by the association’s bylaws or rules as provided in subsection A.

History.

2013, c. 310, § 55-513.2; 2019, cc. 2, 30, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 310, cl. 2 provides: “That the General Assembly finds that the objectives of this act serve the public interest by promoting Virginia’s small businesses.”

Acts 2019, cc. 2 and 30 amended § 55-513.2, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by designating the existing text as subsection A and adding subsection B.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinion cited below refers to prior law.

Restrictive covenants must be reasonable. —

Property Owners’ Association’s restrictive covenant limiting the use of lots in residential areas for residential purposes exclusively is enforceable, subject to the exception that a home office that does not generate customer or client traffic is deemed a residential use. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable R. Lee Ware, Member, House of Delegates, No. 16-029,
(1/18/17).

§ 55.1-1822.
Use of for sale signs in connection with sale.

Except as expressly authorized in this chapter or in the declaration or as otherwise provided by law, no property owners’ association shall require the use of any for sale sign that is (i) an association sign or (ii) a real estate sign that does not comply with the requirements of the Real Estate Board. An association may, however, prohibit the placement of signs in the common area and establish reasonable rules and regulations that regulate (a) the number of real estate signs to be located on real property upon which the owner has a separate ownership interest or a right of exclusive possession, so long as at least one real estate sign is permitted; (b) the geographical location of real estate signs on real property in which the owner has a separate ownership interest or a right of exclusive possession, so long as the location of the real estate signs complies with the requirements of the Real Estate Board; (c) the manner in which real estate signs are affixed to real property; and (d) the period of time after settlement when the real estate signs on such real property shall be removed.

History.

2008, cc. 851, 871, § 55-509.4; 2010, c. 165; 2014, c. 216; 2016, c. 471; 2017, cc. 387, 405; 2018, c. 226; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Virginia” was deleted preceding “Real Estate Board” to correct an error in the 2019 act.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1823.
Designation of authorized representative.

Except as expressly authorized in this chapter or in the declaration or as otherwise provided by law, no property owners’ association shall require any lot owner to execute a formal power of attorney if the lot owner designates a person licensed under the provisions of §

54.1-2106.1

as the lot owner’s authorized representative, and the association shall recognize such representation without a formal power of attorney, provided that the association is given a written authorization that includes the designated representative’s name, contact information, and license number and the lot owner’s signature. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the requirements of §

13.1-849

of the Virginia Nonstock Corporation Act (§

13.1-801

et seq.) and the association’s declaration, bylaws, and articles of incorporation shall be satisfied before any such representative may exercise a vote on behalf of a lot owner as a proxy.

History.

2008, cc. 851, 871, § 55-509.4; 2010, c. 165; 2014, c. 216; 2016, c. 471; 2017, cc. 387, 405; 2018, c. 226; 2019, c. 712; 2022, cc. 65, 66.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 65 and 66 are identical, and substituted “that includes the designated representative’s name, contact information, and license number and the lot owner’s signature” for “signed by the lot owner designating such representative.”

§ 55.1-1823.1.
Electric vehicle charging stations permitted.

Except to the extent that the declaration or other recorded governing document provides otherwise, no association shall prohibit any lot owner from installing an electric vehicle charging station for the lot owner’s personal use on property owned by the lot owner. An association may establish reasonable restrictions concerning the number, size, place, and manner of placement or installation of such electric vehicle charging station on the exterior of property owned by the lot owner.

An association may prohibit or restrict the installation of electric vehicle charging stations on the common area within the development served by the association and may establish reasonable restrictions as to the number, size, place, and manner of placement or installation of electric vehicle charging stations on the common area.

Any lot owner installing an electric vehicle charging station shall indemnify and hold the association harmless from all liability, including reasonable attorney fees incurred by the association resulting from a claim, arising out of the installation, maintenance, operation, or use of such electric charging station. An association may require the lot owner to obtain and maintain insurance covering claims and defenses of claims related to the installation, maintenance, operation, or use of the electric vehicle charging station and require the association to be included as a named insured on such policy.

History.

2020, c. 1012.

§ 55.1-1824.
Assessments; late fees.

Except to the extent that the declaration or any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to such declaration provide otherwise, the board may impose a late fee that does not exceed the penalty provided in §

58.1-3915

for any assessment or installment that is not paid within 60 days of the due date for payment of such assessment.

History.

2013, c. 256, § 55-513.3; 2014, c. 239; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1825.
Authority to levy special assessments.

In addition to all other assessments that are authorized in the declaration, the board of directors shall have the power to levy a special assessment against its members if (i) the purpose in so doing is found by the board to be in the best interests of the association and (ii) the proceeds of the assessment are used primarily for the maintenance and upkeep of the common area and such other areas of association responsibility expressly provided for in the declaration, including capital expenditures. A majority of votes cast, in person or by proxy, at a meeting of the membership convened in accordance with the provisions of the association’s bylaws within 60 days of promulgation of the notice of the assessment shall rescind or reduce the special assessment. No director or officer of the association shall be liable for failure to perform his fiduciary duty if a special assessment for the funds necessary for the director or officer to perform his fiduciary duty is rescinded by the owners pursuant to this section, and the association shall indemnify such director or officer against any damage resulting from any such claimed breach of fiduciary duty.

The failure of a member to pay the special assessment allowed by subsection A shall entitle the association to the lien provided by §

55.1-1833

as well as any other rights afforded a creditor under law.

The failure of a member to pay the special assessment allowed by subsection A will provide the association with the right to deny the member access to any or all of the common areas. However, the member shall not be denied direct access to the member’s lot over any road within the development that is a common area.

History.

1989, c. 679, § 55-514; 1991, c. 667; 1992, c. 450; 1998, cc. 32, 751; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1826.
Annual budget; reserves for capital components.

Except to the extent provided in the declaration, the board of directors shall, prior to the commencement of the fiscal year, make available to lot owners either (i) the annual budget of the association or (ii) a summary of such annual budget.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the declaration and unless the declaration imposes more stringent requirements, the board of directors shall:

Conduct at least once every five years a study to determine the necessity and amount of reserves required to repair, replace, and restore the capital components as defined in §

55.1-1800

;

Review the results of that study at least annually to determine if reserves are sufficient; and

Make any adjustments the board of directors deems necessary to maintain reserves, as appropriate.

To the extent that the reserve study conducted in accordance with this section indicates a need to budget for reserves, the association budget shall include:

The current estimated replacement cost, estimated remaining life, and estimated useful life of the capital components as defined in §

55.1-1800

;

As of the beginning of the fiscal year for which the budget is prepared, the current amount of accumulated cash reserves set aside to repair, replace, or restore capital components and the amount of the expected contribution to the reserve fund for that year;

A statement describing the procedures used for estimation and accumulation of cash reserves pursuant to this section; and

A statement of the amount of reserves recommended in the study and the amount of current cash for replacement reserves.

History.

2002, c. 459, § 55-514.1; 2019, cc. 33, 44, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 33 and 44 amended § 55-514.1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by
adding subsection A; in subdivisions B 1 and C 1, inserting “as defined in §

55.1-1800

”; in subdivision C 3, substituting “A statement” for “A general statement”
and deleting “and the extent to which the association is funding its reserve obligations consistent with the study currently in effect” at the end; adding subdivision C 4; and making stylistic changes.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “§

55.1-1800

” for “§ 55-509.”

Acts 2019, cc. 33 and 44, cl. 2 provides: “That the Common Interest Community Board shall develop guidelines for the development of reserve studies for capital components, including a list of capital components that should be addressed in a reserve study. ”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Editor’s note. —

The case cited below was decided under prior law.

Section supplemented declaration of covenant. —

Homeowners’ claims against a homeowners’ association for raiding the association’s capital reserves to pay its attorney’s fees, in violation of § 55-514.1, was not subject to demurrer because this section supplemented the association’s declaration of covenants and was binding on it. Farran v. Olde Belhaven Towne Owners' Ass'n, 83 Va. Cir. 286, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 114 (Fairfax County Aug. 24, 2011).